Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.085

Savings account holder to receive withdrawable savings account(s)—Amount.

Each savings account holder of the converting savings bank shall receive, without payment, a withdrawable savings account or accounts in the converted savings bank equal in withdrawable amount to the withdrawal value of the account holder's savings account or accounts in the converting savings bank.

[ 1981 c 85 s 16.]